Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1904
Enforcement; penalty.

(1) The Attorney General shall apply for an injunction in the district court in the county in which any violation of section 69-1903 occurs to enjoin the defendant from engaging in any practice which violates such section. Notice shall be given by certified mail to the defendant at least five days prior to the hearing on such injunction.

(2) The Attorney General may bring a civil action against any person violating section 69-1903. A civil penalty shall be imposed on such person in an amount of five hundred dollars for the first offense and in an amount of not less than six hundred dollars nor more than three thousand dollars for a second or subsequent offense. Each distribution of a single package to an individual member of the general public shall be considered a separate violation under section 69-1903.

Laws 1989, LB 48, § 4.